apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="замин/е__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist дојд/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ав</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аа</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

		<!-- par: побара
		group: а
		cat_type: finite
		 -->

    <pardef n="побар/а__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ај</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ајте</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аш</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аме</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ате</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аат</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist побар/а -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ав</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авме</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авте</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аа</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	<!-- par: носи
		group: и
		cat_type: non-finite
	-->

    <pardef n="нос/и__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative нос/и -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present нос/и -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>иш</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>име</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Imperfect нос/и -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ев</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еше</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евме</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>евте</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еа</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <e lm="замине"><i>замин</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="започне"><i>започн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="истакне"><i>истакн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="каже"><i>каж</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="покаже"><i>покаж</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="помине"><i>помин</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="помогне"><i>помогн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="постигне"><i>постигн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="потпише"><i>потпиш</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="почне"><i>почн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="признае"><i>призн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="стане"><i>стан</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="стигне"><i>стигн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="успее"><i>успе</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="земе"><i>зем</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="загине"><i>загин</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="почине"><i>почин</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="сретне"><i>сретн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="остане"><i>остан</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="падне"><i>падн</i><par n="замин/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="повика"><i>повик</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="одигра"><i>одигр</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="совлада"><i>совлад</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="венча"><i>венч</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="влета"><i>влет</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="врза"><i>врз</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="дигна"><i>дигн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="дозна"><i>дозн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="допатува"><i>допатув</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="дочека"><i>дочек</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="закажа"><i>закаж</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="запиша"><i>запиш</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="запозна"><i>запозн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="засака"><i>засак</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="застрела"><i>застрел</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="зачува"><i>зачув</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="избегна"><i>избегн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="избрка"><i>избрк</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="изгласа"><i>изглас</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="излажа"><i>излаж</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="измеша"><i>измеш</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="искажа"><i>искаж</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="испадна"><i>испадн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="испланира"><i>испланир</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="истера"><i>истер</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="истрча"><i>истрч</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="крена"><i>крен</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="напиша"><i>напиш</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="наврна"><i>наврн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="наметна"><i>наметн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="нарача"><i>нарач</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="натера"><i>натер</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="обврза"><i>обврз</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="одбра"><i>одбр</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="одзва"><i>одзв</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="опиша"><i>опиш</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="отпатува"><i>отпатув</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="поврза"><i>поврз</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="поддржа"><i>поддрж</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="подлегна"><i>подлегн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="покрена"><i>покрен</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="порасна"><i>порасн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="посомнева"><i>посомнев</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прегледа"><i>преглед</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="препорача"><i>препорач</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="претера"><i>претер</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="проба"><i>проб</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="разбра"><i>разбр</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="раскина"><i>раскин</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="скара"><i>скар</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="собра"><i>собр</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="тргна"><i>тргн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="упадна"><i>упадн</i><par n="побар/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="носи"><i>нос</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="оди"><i>од</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прави"><i>прав</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="мисли"><i>мисл</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="работи"><i>работ</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="стои"><i>сто</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="љуби"><i>љуб</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="губи"><i>губ</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="слави"><i>слав</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="следи"><i>след</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="води"><i>вод</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="нуди"><i>нуд</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="движи"><i>движ</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="грижи"><i>гриж</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="должи"><i>долж</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="држи"><i>држ</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="мери"><i>мер</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="говори"><i>говор</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="гради"><i>град</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="жали"><i>жал</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прими"><i>прим</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="брани"><i>бран</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="вели"><i>вел</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="постои"><i>посто</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="чекори"><i>чекор</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="користи"><i>корист</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="врши"><i>врш</i><par n="нос/и__vblex"/></e>
